Oklahoma, session 2025, SB873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 3204, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3204. A. Until July 1, 1993, the University Hospitals
shall be under the jurisdiction, supervision, management and control
of the Department of Human Services and the Commission for Human
Services.


SB873 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. Effective July 1, 1993, the University Hospitals are hereby
transferred from the Department of Human Services and the Commission
for Human Services to the University Hospitals Authority.
C. The transfer shall include:
1. All powers, duties, responsibilities, properties, assets,
fund balances, encumbrances, obligations, records, personnel and
liabilities including, but not limited to, liability for all
University Hospital employees’ sick leave, annual leave, holidays,
unemployment benefits and workers’ compensation benefits accruing to
employees prior to July 1, 1993, which are attributable to the
University Hospitals; provided, however, that any claims arising
under the Governmental Tort Claims Act and filed prior to July 1,
1993, and from any other actions filed prior to July 1, 1993, shall
remain the responsibility of the Department of Human Services and
the Commission for Human Services. All claims arising prior to July
1, 1993 and for which no action has been filed shall be paid by the
Risk Management Program;
2. Oklahoma Children’s Hospital and all buildings and
appurtenances located on land which is described as follows: Blocks
B, 3, 4, 12 and 13, and the North 30 feet of Block 14; and Lots 6
through 15, Block 21, CULBERTSON HEIGHTS ADDITION less and except
the West 7 feet of Lot 5 and all of Lots 6 through 19, and the East
5 feet of Lot 20 and the North 59.5 feet of Lots 21 through 26, and
the North 59.5 feet of the West 49.5 feet of Lot 27, all in Block
SB873 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

13, CULBERTSON HEIGHTS ADDITION to the City of Oklahoma City,
Oklahoma, and also less and except the West 106 feet of the vacated
Northeast 12th Street abutting said Block 13; and a part of Block
20, CULBERTSON HEIGHTS ADDITION and a part of the alleys adjacent
thereto, and a part of the SW 1/4, Section 26, T12N, R3W, I.M., and
a part of the SE 1/4, Sec. 27, T12N, R3W, I.M., Oklahoma County,
Oklahoma, and a part of vacated Kelley Avenue adjacent thereto, more
particularly described as follows: Commencing at the NE corner of
Block 20, CULBERTSON HEIGHTS ADDITION, Oklahoma City, Oklahoma,
thence S. 0 degrees 03’ 34” E. and along the East line of said Block
20 and along the West Right-of-Way line of Stonewall Avenue a
distance of 10 ft. to the point or place of beginning; thence
continuing S. 0 degrees 03’ 34” E. and along the East line of said
Block 20 and along the West Right-of-Way line of Stonewall Avenue a
distance of 341.27 ft., thence N. 89 degrees 54’ 35” W. a distance
of 520.10 ft., thence N. 0 degrees 11’ 08” E. a distance of 18.0
ft.; thence N. 89 degrees 48’ 52” W. a distance of 12.0 ft.; thence
N. 0 degrees 11’ 08” E. a distance of 6 ft.; thence N. 89 degrees
48’ 52” W. a distance of 21.5 ft., thence N. 0 degrees 11’ 08” E. a
distance of 22.5 ft., thence N. 89 degrees 48’ 52” W. a distance of
286.5 ft., thence N. 89 degrees 48’ 52” W. a distance of 27.00 feet;
thence N. 0 degrees 12’ 03” E. a distance of 72.50 feet; thence N.
89 degrees 48’ 51” W. a distance of 25.65 feet; thence N. 23 degrees
29’ 12” W. a distance of 250.50 feet to a point on the South Right-
SB873 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

of-W ay line of N.E. 13th Street; thence S. 89 degrees 48’ 51” E. and
along the South Right-of-Way line of N.E. 13th Street a distance of
649.76 feet; to a point in the East line of said SE 1/4 of Section
27, T12N, R3W, thence S. 0 degrees 06’ 23” W. along the East line of
said Section 27, a distance of 10.0 ft., thence N. 89 degrees 33’
42” E. and parallel to and 10 ft., South of the North line of said
Block 20 of said CULBERTSON HEIGHTS ADDITION a distance of 342.10
ft. to the point or place of beginning; and
3. a. University Hospital and all buildings and
appurtenances located on land which is described as
follows: A part of the South Half of the Southeast
Quarter of Section 27, T12N, R3W of the Indian
Meridian AND a part of the North Half of the Northeast
Quarter of Section 34, T12N, R3W, of the Indian
Meridian, all in Oklahoma County, Oklahoma, more
particularly described as follows: Beginning at the
Southwest corner of Block 13, HOWE’S CAPITOL ADDITION;
thence N. 0 degrees 10’ 36” E. along the East line of
Phillips Avenue a distance of 674.64 feet to a point
on the South line of Northeast 13th Street; thence S.
89 degrees 48’ 51” E. along the South line of said
Northeast 13th Street a distance of 620.30 feet;
thence S. 23 degrees 29’ 12” E. a distance of 250.50
feet; thence S. 89 degrees 48’ 51” E. a distance of
SB873 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

25.65 feet; thence S. 0 degrees 12’ 03” W. a distance
of 72.50 feet; thence S. 89 degrees 48’ 51” E. a
distance of 27.00 feet; thence S. 00 degrees 12’ 03”
W. a distance of 443.57 feet; thence S. 89 degrees 43’
03” E. a distance of 32.95 feet; thence S. 00 degrees
14’ 28” W. along the East line of a retaining wall a
distance of 733.66 feet to a point on the South line
of Block 1 of OAK PARK ADDITION; thence S. 89 degrees
52’ 55” W. along the South line of Blocks 1 and 7 of
OAK PARK ADDITION a distance of 810.11 feet to the
Southwest corner of said Block 7; thence N. 00 degrees
10’ 36” E. along the West line of said Block 7, OAK
PARK ADDITION a distance of 213.87 feet; thence N. 89
degrees 49’ 24” W. a distance of 3.40 feet; thence N.
00 degrees 10’ 36” E. along the West line of Block 24,
HOWE’S CAPITOL ADDITION a distance of 190.00 feet;
thence S. 89 degrees 49’ 24” E. a distance of 8.10
feet; thence N. 00 degrees 10’ 36” E. along the West
line of Block 18, HOWE’S CAPITOL ADDITION a distance
of 405.00 feet to the Point of Beginning and
containing 1,146,572 Square Feet or 26.32 Acres more
or less;, and
b. That portion of the property described in subparagraph
a known as the Research Building shall be transferred
SB873 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to the Authority, but shall be leased to the
University of Oklahoma for a term of not less than
forty (40) years from the date thereof; and
c. All of Blocks 1 and 2 of Culbertson Heights Addition,
and all of Block 3 and Lots 3 through 20 and the North
50 feet of Lots 21 through 38 of Block 12, Oak Park
Addition to the City of Oklahoma City, Oklahoma
including the encompassed and abutting portions of the
vacated Northeast 11th Street, Park Place and
Northeast 10th Street, and the abutting portion of
Everest Avenue and the alley way in Block 12 of the
said Oak Park Addition.
D. Properties to be retained by the The Department of Human
Services include:
1. The shall retain the Service Center Building and land
located on: The South 100 feet of Block 12 and all of Block 17, Oak
Park Addition to the City of Oklahoma City, Oklahoma including the
encompassed or abutting portions of vacated Everest Avenue and
Northeast 9th Street. (219,300 sq. ft., 5.03 acres); and
2. The Management Information Division Building and land
located on: The West 7 feet of Lot 5 and all of Lots 6 through 19,
and the East 5 feet of Lot 20 and the North 59.5 feet of Lots 21
through 26, and the North 59.5 feet of the West 49.5 feet of Lot 27,
all in Block 13, Culbertson Heights Addition to the City of Oklahoma
SB873 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

City , Oklahoma, and also including the West 106 feet of the vacated
Northeast 12th Street abutting said Block 13. (82,199 sq. ft., 1.89
acres).
E. Appropriate conveyances shall be executed to effectuate the
transfers specified by subsections B, C and D of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 3205, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3205. A. The transfer of the University Hospitals from
the Commission for Human Services and the Department of Human
Services shall not require a Certificate of Need pursuant to the
provisions of Sections 2651 through 2656.2 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; provided, however, that Notwithstanding any other
law, any expansion, addition, or change to the University Hospitals
requiring a Certificate of Need after such transfer shall be subject
to the provisions of Sections 2651 through 2656.2 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes in furtherance of the University Hospitals
Authority Act shall not require a certificate of need.
B. 1. University Hospitals shall be operated as general
hospitals and shall be licensed by the State Commissioner of Health,
and shall, as far as possible, meet the standards, requirements and
essentials of the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Health Care
Organizations, the American Medical Association’s Council on Medical
Education, the American Specialty Boards and the Association of
American Medical Colleges.
SB873 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. The University Hospitals shall operate a public Level I
Trauma Center and shall meet the standards and requirements of the
American College of Surgeons to attain such designation. The
University Hospitals Authority shall annually certify to the
Oklahoma Health Care Authority that the University Hospitals meet
such standards and requirements with respect to any Medicaid
supplemental payments to be received from the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority for the public Level I Trauma Center.
3. The University Hospitals may provide services and receive
payments therefor under Titles XVIII and XIX of the federal Social
Security Act, and may participate in other federal medical programs.
3. 4. University Hospitals shall be available as teaching and
training hospitals for the colleges of the University of Oklahoma
Health Sciences Center, for the College of Medicine of the
University of Oklahoma College of Medicine, and for other health and
educational facilities and shall provide indigent patient care.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 04/22/2025 - DO PASS.





SB873 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.